src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_to_noun.lexc
LEXICON tup_2_inflections
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg:@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; 
+N+Abs+Pl:^T%>it K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>g2a@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>t@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- !overgenerer ret meget: inuak -> inuit, aasiak -> aasiaat
!@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>it@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- !til najugaqarfiit, suliffiit
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>a@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:^T%>ni@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss+TTAAQ:^T%>nissaaq@U.Num.Sg@ # ;
+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>kka K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>tit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>i K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss:^T%>ni K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>put@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- !regel %> ^T r p u t -> %> p u t || k %> _
!! | --- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>rsi@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:^T%>at@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>tik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss:^T%>vut K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>gut K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss:^T%>si K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss:^T%>tik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>sik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg:^T%>up@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl:^T%>it K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>ma@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>pit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>vit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>ata@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>mi@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>ma K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>ma K_plur ;
+N+Rel+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>vit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>isa K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss:^T%>mi K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:^T%>tta@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>ssi@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:^T%>ata@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>mik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss:^T%>tta K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss:^T%>ssi K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>isa K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss:^T%>mik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg:%>mut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup-
+N+Trm+Pl:%>nut TrmVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:^T%>nnut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>nnut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>anut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup-
+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>nnut TrmVb ; !tup-
+N+Trm+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>nnut TrmVb ; !tup-
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>inut TrmVb ; !tup-
+N+Trm+Pl+4SgPoss:^T%>minut TrmVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinnut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinnut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:^T%>annut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>minnut@U.Num.Sg@ TrmVb ; !tup-
+N+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinnut TrmVb ; !tup-
+N+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinnut TrmVb ; !tup-
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>nut TrmVb ; !tup- !regel %> ^T a n n u t -> %> ^T i n u t || [ u | i ] _
!! | --- 
+N+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:^T%>minnut TrmVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg:%>mit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg:%>minngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- liv 170405
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>minngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- liv 170405
+N+Abl+Pl:%>nit AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:^T%>nnit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>nnit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>anit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>nnit AblVb ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>nnit AblVb ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>init AblVb ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:^T%>minit AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinnit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinnit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:^T%>annit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:^T%>minnit@U.Num.Sg@ AblVb ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinnit AblVb ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinnit AblVb ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>nit AblVb ; !tup- !regel %> ^T a n n i t -> %> ^T i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | --- 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minnit AblVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg:%>miit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Pl:%>niit@U.Num.Sg@ K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>niik@U.Num.Sg@ K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:^T%>nniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>nniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>nniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>nniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>aniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>aniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>miniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>miniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>nniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>nniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>nniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>nniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>iniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>iniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>miniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>miniik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>tsinniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>ssinniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:^T%>anniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>anniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:^T%>minniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>minniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>tsinniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>ssinniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>niit K_plur ; !tup- !regel %> ^T a n n i t -> %> ^T i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | ---
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>it^POSST%>niik K_plur ; !tup- !regel %> ^T a n n i t -> %> ^T i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | --- 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>minniik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg:%>minngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>minngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl:%>ninngaanniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>ninngaanniik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:^T%>nninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>nninngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>nninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>nninngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>aninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>aninngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:@U.Num.Sg@%>mininngaanniit Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:@U.Num.Sg@%>mininngaanniik Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>nninngaanniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>nninngaanniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>nninngaanniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>nninngaanniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>ininngaanniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>ininngaanniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>mininngaanniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>mininngaanniik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>tsinninngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>ssinninngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:^T%>anninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>anninngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:^T%>minninngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>minninngaanniik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinninngaanniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>tsinninngaanniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinninngaanniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>ssinninngaanniik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>ninngaanniit K_plur ; !tup- !regel %> ^T a n n i t -> %> ^T i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | ---
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^T%>it^POSST%>ninngaanniik K_plur ; !tup- !regel %> ^T a n n i t -> %> ^T i n i t || [ u | i ] _
!! | --- 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minninngaanniit K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>minninngaanniik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg:%>mi@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup-
+N+Lok+Pl:%>ni LokVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:^T%>nni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>nni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>ani@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>mini@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup-
+N+Lok+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>nni LokVb ; !tup-
+N+Lok+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>nni LokVb ; !tup-
+N+Lok+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>ini LokVb ; !tup-
+N+Lok+Pl+4SgPoss:^T%>mini LokVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:^T%>anni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:^T%>minni@U.Num.Sg@ LokVb ; !tup-
+N+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinni LokVb ; !tup-
+N+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinni LokVb ; !tup-
+N+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>ni LokVb ; !tup- !regel %> ^T a n n i -> %> ^T i n i || [ u | i ] _
!! | --- 
+N+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:%>minni LokVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg:%>tut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup-
+N+Aeq+Pl:%>tut AeqVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:^T%>ttut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>ttut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>atut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>misut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup-
+N+Aeq+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>ttut AeqVb ; !tup-
+N+Aeq+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>ttut AeqVb ; !tup-
+N+Aeq+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>isut AeqVb ; !tup-
+N+Aeq+Pl+4SgPoss:^T%>misut AeqVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:^T%>tsitut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>ssitut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:^T%>attut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:^T%>mittut@U.Num.Sg@ AeqVb ; !tup-
+N+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:^T%>tsitut AeqVb ; !tup-
+N+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:^T%>ssitut AeqVb ; !tup-
+N+Aeq+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>tut AeqVb ; !tup- 
+N+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:%>mittut AeqVb ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg:%>mik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- 
+N+Ins+Pl:%>nik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:^T%>nnik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:^T%>nnik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:^T%>anik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>minik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
+N+Ins+Pl+1SgPoss:^T%>nnik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Ins+Pl+2SgPoss:^T%>nnik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Ins+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>inik K_plur ; !tup-
+N+Ins+Pl+4SgPoss:^T%>minik K_plur ; !tup-
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:^T%>tsinnik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup- 
@U.Num.Sg@+N+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:^T%>ssinnik@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; !tup-
